North Carolina, session 2025, SB501.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of eleven million dollars ($11,000,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year for the downtown development in the Town of Edenton, known as
the TEAPOT Project. These funds may be used for building renovation and additional downtown
development.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S501-v-1*